Washington statutes.
RCW 42.26.040

Petty cash accounts—Authorized—Advancements.

The state treasurer is authorized to advance moneys from treasury funds to state agencies for the purpose of establishing petty cash accounts. Any agency may petition the office of financial management for the establishment of a petty cash account. The maximum amount of such accounts shall be based on the special needs of the petitioning agency and shall be subject to approval by the office of financial management. The amount so advanced shall be reflected in the state treasurer's accounts as an amount due from the agency to the fund or account from which the advance was made.

[ 1979 c 151 s 75; 1977 c 40 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 60 s 4.]